Florida, session 2026, SB66.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 22 23 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 83.803, Florida 24 Statutes, is amended to read: 25 83.803âDefinitions.âAs used in ss. 83.801-83.809: 26 (1)ââLast known addressâ means the street address or post 27 office box address provided by the tenant in the latest rental 28 agreement or, subject to any requirement in the rental 29 agreement, in a subsequent written change-of-address notice 30 provided by hand delivery, first-class mail, or e-mail. 31 Section 2.âSubsections (1) and (4) of section 83.806, 32 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 33 83.806âEnforcement of lien.âAn ownerâs lien as provided in 34 s. 83.805 may be satisfied as follows: 35 (1)âThe owner must notify the tenant and any alternate 36 contact tenant shall be notified by written notice delivered in 37 person, by e-mail, or by first-class mail with a certificate of 38 mailing to the tenantâs and, if applicable, the alternate 39 contactâs last known address and conspicuously posted at the 40 self-service storage facility or on the self-contained storage 41 unit. If the owner sends notice of a pending sale of property to 42 the tenantâs last known e-mail address and does not receive a 43 response, return receipt, or delivery confirmation from the same 44 e-mail address, the owner must send notice of the sale to the 45 tenant by first-class mail with a certificate of mailing to the 46 tenantâs last known address before proceeding with the sale. 47 (4)âAfter the expiration of the time given in the notice, 48 an advertisement of the sale or other disposition must shall be 49 published once a week for 2 consecutive weeks in a newspaper of 50 general circulation in the area where the self-service storage 51 facility or self-contained storage unit is located or on a 52 public website that customarily conducts or advertises personal 53 property auctions or sales. 54 (a)âA lien sale may be conducted on a public website that 55 customarily conducts personal property auctions or sales. The 56 facility or unit owner is not required to hold a license to post 57 property for online sale. Inasmuch As any sale may involve 58 property of more than one tenant, a single advertisement may be 59 used to dispose of property at any one sale. 60 (b)âThe advertisement must shall include: 61 1.âA brief and general description of what is believed to 62 constitute the personal property contained in the storage unit, 63 as provided in paragraph (2)(b). 64 2.âThe address of the self-service storage facility or the 65 address where the self-contained storage unit is located and the 66 name of the tenant. 67 3.âThe time, place, and manner of the sale or other 68 disposition. The sale or other disposition must shall take place 69 at least 15 days after the first publication. 70 (c)âIf there is no newspaper of general circulation in the 71 area where the self-service storage facility or self-contained 72 storage unit is located and no public website exists that 73 customarily conducts or advertises personal property auctions or 74 sales where the self-service facility or self-contained unit is 75 located, the advertisement must shall be posted at least 10 days 76 before the date of the sale or other disposition in at least 77 three conspicuous places in the neighborhood where the self 78 service storage facility or self-contained storage unit is 79 located. 80 Section 3.âSubsection (4) is added to section 83.808, 81 Florida Statutes, to read: 82 83.808âContracts.â 83 (4)âA rental agreement entered into on or after October 1, 84 2026, must contain a provision apprising the tenant of the 85 option to designate an alternate contact to receive notices 86 required by the Self-storage Facility Act and must provide space 87 in the agreement to designate the alternate contact. 88 (a)âFailure or refusal of a tenant to designate an 89 alternate contact does not affect a tenantâs or an ownerâs 90 rights or remedies under this section or under any other law. 91 The alternate contact, if any, does not have any right to access 92 the tenantâs storage space at a self-service storage facility or 93 the tenantâs self-contained storage unit or the personal 94 property contained therein unless expressly stated otherwise in 95 the rental agreement. 96 (b)âFor a rental agreement entered into before October 1, 97 2026, an owner may send notice to a tenantâs last known address 98 to apprise the tenant of his or her right to designate an 99 alternate contact by the method specified by the owner in the 100 notice. 101 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.